Utah statutes.
41-6a-1640.   Air conditioning equipment -- Requirements.
(1)  As used in this section, "air conditioning equipment" means mechanical
vapor compression refrigeration equipment used to cool the operator or
passenger compartment of a motor vehicle.
(2)  Air conditioning equipment shall:
(a)  be manufactured, installed, and maintained with due regard for the safety
of the occupants of the vehicle and the public; and
(b)  not contain any refrigerant which is toxic to persons or which is
flammable.
(3)  A person may not have for sale, offer for sale, sell, or equip any motor
vehicle with air conditioning equipment unless it complies with the
specifications adopted under Section 41-6a-1601 and this section.
(4) A person may not operate a motor vehicle on a highway if the motor vehicle
is equipped with air conditioning equipment unless the air conditioning
equipment complies with the specifications adopted under Section 41-6a-1601
and this section.
